District of Columbia statutes.
29-302.06

Bylaws.

(a)

The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.

(b)

The bylaws of a corporation may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720